Washington statutes.
RCW 44.68.105

Administrative committee, center—Exemption.

The administrative committee and center are hereby expressly exempted from the provisions of chapter 43.105 RCW.

[ 2020 c 114 s 17; 2007 c 18 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.